Utah statutes.
70C-6-203.   Filing and approval of rates and forms.
(1)  A creditor may use a form or a schedule of premium rates or charges
concerning consumer credit insurance only if the form or schedule has been on
file with the Insurance Department for at least 30 days and has not been
disapproved by the Insurance Department or has been specifically approved by
the Insurance Department at any time after filing.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), all policies, certificates of
insurance, notices of proposed insurance, applications for insurance,
endorsements and riders relating to consumer credit insurance delivered or
issued for delivery in this state, and the schedules of premium rates or
charges pertaining to them, shall be filed by the insurer with the Insurance
Department.  Within 30 days after the filing of any form or schedule, the
Insurance Department shall disapprove it if the premium rates or charges are
unreasonable in relation to the benefits provided under the form, or if the
form contains provisions which are unjust, unfair, inequitable, or deceptive,
or encourages misrepresentation, or are contrary to any provisions of this
title, or Title 31A, Chapter 22, Part 8, Credit Life and Accident and Health
Insurance, or of any rule adopted under that act or this title.
(3)  If a group policy has been delivered in another state, the forms to be
filed by the insurer with the Insurance Department are the group certificates
and notices of proposed insurance.  The Insurance Department shall approve
those certificates and notices if:
(a)  they provide the information that would be required if the group policy
were delivered in this state; and
(b)  the applicable premium rates or charges do not exceed those established
by the Insurance Department's rules.
